Götz Werner, founder and owner of dm (Germany’s largest chain of pharmacies) has repeatedly stated that society “cannot develop if we destroy nature” and has further noted that dm customers expect the company to sell only products consistent with this credo. 
However, dm is known to sell products containing palm oil produced in unsustainable ways that can ultimately result in the destruction of rain forests. 
When confronted with this fact, Mr. Werner commented, “If a producer makes shower gel that customers want [to buy], we sell it. It is the responsibility of the producers [to comply with environmental standards]” (ARD, 2012). 
Situations such as this, in which individuals overtly state strong moral values yet act in ways inconsistent with them, pose a paradox: How can such persons express strong support for certain values but then openly violate them? 
One intriguing—and compelling—explanation for such events is provided by the theory of moral disengagement, a framework derived from social cognitive theory (Bandura, 1986, 2001). 
According to this theory (Bandura, 1991), individuals adopt beliefs about what is and is not desirable, use these standards to judge the acceptability of alternative courses of action, and typically regulate their own behavior to be consistent with these standards. 
Such self-regulation, then, is the source of moral agency that causes people to generally “refrain from behaving in ways that violate their moral standards” (Bandura, 1999: 193). 
Although these selfregulatory processes are always present, they are not always active. 
Thus, although moral values can and often do shape decisions and actions, their impact in this regard can be greatly reduced by the process of moral disengagement. 
As defined by Bandura, Barbaranelli, Caprara, and Pastorelli (1996), this term refers to cognitive processes that, when operating, disengage moral values from overt actions. 
The authors wish to thank AMJ’s Timothy Pollock and three anonymous reviewers for their highly constructive comments. 
1251 Copyright of the Academy of Management, all rights reserved. 
Contents may not be copied, emailed, posted to a listserv, or otherwise transmitted without the copyright holder’s express Moral disengagement has been found to play a role in a wide range of unethical actions and decisions (e.g., Moore, Detert, Treviño, Baker, & Mayer, 2012), including lying, cheating, theft, self-serving decision making by persons in authority, antisocial workplace behavior (e.g., Shu, Gino, & Bazerman, 2011), harmful acts of aggression by children (Bandura et al., 1996; Bandura, Underwood, & Fromson, 1975), and shirking civic duties (Caprara, Fida, Vecchione, Tramontano, & Barbaranelli, 2009). 
Also, additional research has helped identify individual difference variables that are positively related to moral disengagement (i.e., “trait cynicism” and “chance locus of control”) and others that are negatively related to moral disengagement (i.e., empathy and “moral identity”) (Detert, Treviño, & Sweitzer, 2008; see also Moore et al., 2012). 
Despite this growing body of evidence, however, much remains to be learned about the nature and impact of moral disengagement and the conditions under which it is more or less likely to occur (Detert et al., 2008). 
In the present research, we seek to add to the current knowledge of moral disengagement and its potentially important effects in business contexts by examining the conditions of its activation in a specific, timely, and—we believe—highly relevant context. 
In keeping with the example of Götz Werner in the opening paragraph, we address the following question: what conditions influence the role of moral disengagement in decisions by founding entrepreneurs holding pro-environmental values to actively pursue opportunities that will generate outcomes inconsistent with these values (i.e., opportunities for which development will cause harm to the natural environment, namely, the physical world, including the earth, biodiversity, and ecosystems [Parris & Kates, 2003])? 
To investigate this question, we draw on and seek to integrate several bodies of theory and empirical findings: moral self-regulation theory (Bandura et al., 1996), research and theory relating to personal values and agency, and research and theory concerning the role of moral values in entrepreneurship (e.g., Bucar & Hisrich, 2001; Hannafey, 2003). 
We test our model using hierarchical linear modeling with data from a judgment task involving 1,264 assessments nested in 83 business founders. 
By doing so, we seek to make three primary contributions. 
First, the growing literature on moral disengagement (Bandura, 1991; Detert et al., 2008; Moore, 2008) has established that in order to engage in actions inconsistent with their values, individuals cognitively restructure the amount or the cause of harm produced by such actions rather than change the underlying values themselves. 
These cognitive tactics include (1) cognitively restructuring specific acts so they appear less harmful (and therefore less inconsistent with moral values), (2) minimizing actors’ role or responsibility (e.g., shifting accountability to others, as in the Götz Werner example), and (3) reducing identification with the victims of harmful acts so that they, rather than the actors, are blamed for the harm they experience (Bandura, 1986; Douglas, 1995). 
We extend this previous work by theorizing and finding that under some conditions, individuals are able to adjust the relationship between their values and the harm produced by various actions (rather than change the underlying values or the amount of harm), so that they perceive the opportunities producing such harm as more attractive. 
By focusing on the personal agency moderators of the relationship between values and the weight assigned to harm, we seek to explicate the specific circumstances conducive to greater or lesser degrees of moral disengagement. 
Second, scholars have long sought to identify the foundations of immoral, dishonest, and illegal behavior (Moore et al., 2012). 
Although much progress toward this goal has been made (e.g., Finn & Frone, 2004; Mishina, Dykes, Block, & Pollock, 2010; Murdock, Hale, & Weber, 2001; Staw & Szwajkowski, 1975), past research has not yet investigated the role of values in such actions. 
However, in the present research, we theorize that values play a significant role in explaining the impact that a specified harm resulting from action has on individuals’ assessments of the attractiveness of taking such action. 
Moreover, we suggest that the nature of this relationship depends on the level of both (taskspecific) entrepreneurial self-efficacy and perceived resource scarcity. 
Thus, we seek a deeper understanding of the decision-making process that leads to immoral or unethical actions through the contingent consideration of values with both entrepreneurial self-efficacy and perceived resource scarcity, rather than by focusing on these variables independently. 
Third, previous research has found that individuals low in self-efficacy are more likely to morally disengage and hence more likely to act unethically than those high in self-efficacy (Farnese, Tramontano, Fida, & Paciello, 2011; Finn & Frone, 2004; Murdock et al., 2001). 
For example, individuals with low learning self-efficacy are more threatened and challenged by the demands of required tests 1252 OctoberAcademy of Management Journal than those with higher self-efficacy (Locke, Frederick, Lee, & Bobko, 1984). 
As a result, they are more likely to morally disengage and cheat (Farnese et al., 2011). 
We seek to expand on and clarify this research by examining the role of personal agency in a very different context—one involving an opportunity to engage in a voluntary task rather than the kind of constrained situations investigated previously. 
We hypothesize and find that, in the context of assessing different options (i.e., opportunities), individuals high in entrepreneurial selfefficacy are likely to disengage their values more than individuals low in entrepreneurial self-efficacy; hence, they are also more likely to assess opportunities inconsistent with their values (i.e., ones that generate harm to the environment) as more attractive. 
Finally, empirical studies have largely relied on selfreported measures for the cognitive tactics of moral disengagement (e.g., Bandura et al., 1996; Caprara et al., 2009; Detert et al., 2008). 
By using a series of conjoint experiments and a within-person design, we are able to focus on the extent to which entrepreneurs disengage pro-environmental values in decisions concerning opportunity exploitation— capturing moral disengagement as it happens. 
This new approach opens up additional research opportunities for exploring the conditions that trigger moral disengagement. 
NATURE, VALUES, AND OPPORTUNITY ASSESSMENTS Harm to the natural environment refers to diminishing the intrinsic value of the physical world (Muehlebach, 2001)—the earth, biodiversity, and ecosystems (Parris & Kates, 2003)—and diminishing a source of resources and services for the life support of current populations and future generations (Daily, 1997). 
Researchers have proposed that there are four primary drivers of business decisions regarding sustaining the natural environment: values, economic opportunities, legislation, and stakeholder pressures (Bansal & Roth, 2000). 
In this article, we focus on values and economic opportunities for several reasons. 
We focus on values because the personal values of top management team members and other organizational decision makers (Agle, Mitchell, & Sonnenfeld, 1999; Lawrence & Morrell, 1995) have been shown to influence decisions that impact the natural environment. 
Indeed, values are at the heart of motivated choice (Judge & Bretz, 1992). 
Specifically, we investigate business founders’ pro-environmental values, because they are closely aligned with the decision context we studied—namely, opportunity exploitation and its harm to the natural environment. 
We also focus on economic outcomes because they are primary motivators of opportunity exploitation (Kuratko, Hornsby, & Naffziger, 1997), and the economic conditions of a firm’s industry are key factors in decision making (Covin & Slevin, 1989; Zahra & Covin, 1995). 
Thus, understanding individuals’ assessments related to exploiting environmentally harmful opportunities requires a concomitant consideration of their values and the economic context in which they make such assessments. 
In this study, we build a values disengagement model of making decisions that cause harm to the natural environment. 
In the present entrepreneurial context, we expect “disengagement” to be visible in the reduced impact of pro-environmental values on the weight assigned to a specified harm to the natural environment in individuals’ assessments of the attractiveness of opportunities available for exploitation. 
The basic prediction is that, as entrepreneurs’ pro-environmental values increase in strength, the weight assigned to a specified harm to the natural environment will increase (i.e., will receive greater emphasis) when they assess the attractiveness of opportunities. 
However, as moral disengagement operates, pro-environmental values will have a reduced impact on the weight of such harm in entrepreneurs’ assessments of the attractiveness of various opportunities (i.e., it will receive decreased emphasis). 
In essence, our model proposes that the impact of pro-environmental values strongly depends on the extent to which such values are active or, alternatively, disengaged from the assessment process. 
In addition, the model proposes that two aspects of personal agency influence the extent to which pro-environmental values are disengaged: decision makers’ beliefs about their competence for the task (i.e., entrepreneurial selfefficacy) and about the munificence of the competitive environment. 
In the sections that follow, we develop each aspect of the model. 
Pro-environmental Values and Assessments of Entrepreneurial Opportunities There are numerous explanations for why an opportunity’s specified harm to the natural environment could negatively influence entrepreneurs’ assessments of its attractiveness. 
For example, entrepreneurs might anticipate damage to their personal and/or their firms’ reputation from pursu2013 1253Shepherd, Patzelt, and Baron ing opportunities that harm the environment (as per findings on the relationship between illegal actions and damage to a manager’s and an organization’s reputation (Karpoff, Lee, & Martin, 2008; Karpoff & Lott, 1993; Wiesenfeld, Wurthmann, & Hambrick, 2008)). 
However, there is likely to be heterogeneity in entrepreneurs’ judgments of the importance of anticipated losses, because personal values guide such judgments. 
For example, Agle et al. (1999) found that other-regarding values influence the importance that CEOs attach to employees in their decisions impacting corporate performance. 
Values are “an enduring belief that a specific mode of conduct or end-state of existence is personally or socially preferable to an opposite or converse mode of conduct or end-state of existence” (Rokeach, 1973: 5). As such, they represent guiding principles (Schwartz & Bilsky, 1990) for decision making and subsequent action (Fishbein & Ajzen, 1972; Spash, 2002; Thøgersen & Ölander, 2002). 
Indeed, to a large extent, individuals acquire moral values over time through socialization, much of which occurs in childhood through interactions with parents (Grusec, 2011). 
Because values are acquired through a process extending over many years (Grusec, 2011), we assume in our model that they are relatively stable during assessments of entrepreneurial opportunities and do not change readily with information about the nature of an opportunity. 
In this research, we focus on values related to the natural environment—specifically, values that underlie respect for the natural environment. 
Although pro-environmental values are discussed in general in the literature, they are rarely specified. 
An exception is the United Nations’ “Millennium Declaration” (United Nations General Assembly, 2000), which identified the precepts of sustainable development as respect for nature, shared responsibility, freedom, equality, solidarity, and tolerance (see also Shepherd, Kuskova, & Patzelt, 2009). 
Focusing on the natural environment, respect for nature refers to “prudence in the management of all living species and natural resources” to ensure they are “preserved and passed on to our descendants” and a recognition that “current patterns of production and consumption are unsustainable and must be changed” (United Nations General Assembly, 2000). 
Perceiving an opportunity that harms the natural environment as highly attractive is likely to be inconsistent with these general principles. 
Thus, when entrepreneurs are provided with information about how an opportunity they are considering will negatively influence the natural environment, those with stronger pro-environmental values will pay more attention to that information and will weight it more heavily (i.e., assign it increased emphasis) in their opportunity assessments than entrepreneurs with weaker pro-environmental values. 
Thus, we propose the following hypothesis: Hypothesis 1. In assessing the attractiveness of opportunities, the stronger entrepreneurs’ proenvironmental values, the greater the weight they assign to a specified harm to the natural environment generated by these opportunities. 
Factors Influencing the Disengagement of Pro-environmental Values Research findings indicate there are substantial individual differences with respect to the propensity to demonstrate moral disengagement (e.g., Moore et al., 2012). 
In a given situation, some individuals readily disengage their values, while others are less likely to do so. From an agency perspective, Detert et al. (2008) theorized and found that locus of control orientation is positively related to moral disengagement. 
That is, individuals who believe they do not have control over life experiences and events but believe life experiences and events are controlled by luck and fate rather than personal initiative (Detert et al., 2008; Levenson, 1981) are more likely to disengage from their values. 
Such a general belief about lack of control over life experiences and events is, however, unlikely to exist in a sample of business founders, who (with some variation) largely believe they can influence the outcomes they experience (e.g., Hmieleski & Baron, 2009). 
Believing in the ability to influence one’s life course reflects personal agency. 
Social cognitive theory (Bandura, 1989, 2001) proposes that among the determinants of personal agency, “none is more central or pervasive than people’s beliefs in their capability to exercise some measure of control over their own functioning and over environmental events” (Bandura, 2001: 10) (see also Stajkovic and Luthans [1998] for a meta-analysis on human functioning). 
Individuals’ beliefs in the capability to exercise control concern both successful task performance and the individuals’ impact on subsequent events and outcomes. 
In the entrepreneurial context, a central task for business founders is exploiting opportunities (Davidsson & Honig, 2003; Gartner, 1990), and founders’ beliefs about capabil1254 OctoberAcademy of Management Journal ity to successfully perform this task represent a key aspect of entrepreneurial self-efficacy (Chen, Greene, & Crick, 1998; Zhao, Seibert, & Hills, 2005). 
Further, beliefs about whether successfully performing a task will directly lead to positive outcomes partly depend on perceptions of the abundance of resources in an industry (Covin & Slevin, 1989; Tsai, MacMillan, & Low, 1991). 
Below, we examine the effects of these two factors related to personal agency—namely, entrepreneurial selfefficacy and perceived industry munificence—on the relationship between pro-environmental values and the weight assigned to specified harm to the natural environment resulting from opportunity exploitation. 
Entrepreneurial self-efficacy. 
One factor that can potentially influence the extent to which values are disengaged is self-efficacy—individuals’ belief that they can accomplish whatever they set out to accomplish and therefore successfully achieve self-set goals (Utsch, Rauch, Rothfuss, & Frese, 1999; Zhao et al., 2005). 
This belief, as it relates to our study—specifically, that one can successfully create and manage one’s own business (i.e., entrepreneurial self-efficacy [Chen et al., 1998])—may encourage greater disengagement of pro-environmental values in several ways. 
Self-regulation is based on the premise that people do things that “give them satisfaction and a sense of self-worth, and they refrain from behaving in ways that violate their moral standards because such conduct will bring self-condemnation” (White, Bandura, & Bero, 2009: 42). 
Individuals’ feelings of satisfaction and sense of self-worth are enhanced when they engage in tasks they feel competent to accomplish, and actually accomplishing such tasks further enhances their perceived competence (Ryan & Deci, 2000, 2001). 
As a result, “self-efficacy beliefs function as an important set of proximal determinants of human self-regulation” (Bandura, 1991: 257). 
Specifically, entrepreneurial self-efficacy refers to the strength of a person’s belief that he or she is capable of performing the tasks required to create and successfully manage his or her own business (Chen et al., 1998). 
Entrepreneurial self-efficacy has been found to be positively related to the intention to act entrepreneurially (Zhao et al., 2005; Zhao, Seibert, & Lumpkin, 2010) and to entrepreneurial action (Boyd & Vozikis, 1994). 
Although one key entrepreneurial task (i.e., innovation) involves generating new ideas, products, processes, and markets, the other tasks representing the subdimensions of entrepreneurial self-efficacy are focused on effective opportunity exploitation (Chen et al., 1998). 
More generally, people are drawn to activities in which they are competent (Bandura & Schunk, 1981; Ryan & Deci, 2000), and individuals high in self-efficacy are often drawn to challenging tasks that test and build their capabilities (Csikszentmihalyi, 1979) as well as experiences that provide personal satisfaction (Srivastava, Locke, Judge, & Adams, 2010). 
After all, they believe—often fervently—that they can successfully meet these challenges. 
Therefore, when confronted with opportunities that harm the natural environment, individuals high in entrepreneurial self-efficacy are often drawn to using their capabilities to actively exploit them. 
However, as noted above, moral values may operate to restrain such actions. 
Consequently, in such contexts, individuals face a conflict regarding actions that will promote satisfaction and self-worth but will simultaneously violate their moral standards and generate self-censure. 
As Bandura noted, “selective moral disengagement is most likely to occur under moral predicaments in which detrimental conduct brings valued outcomes” (2006: 171). 
In contrast, for those low in entrepreneurial selfefficacy, there is relatively little conflict between satisfaction and sense of self-worth, on the one hand, and moral standards, on the other, when assessing the attractiveness of opportunities that harm the natural environment. 
Individuals low in entrepreneurial self-efficacy harbor doubts that the benefits of such opportunities will be realized, because they are uncertain that they will successfully exploit them. 
More generally, individuals low in self-efficacy are easily dissuaded by obstacles (Gist, 1987), which may include their own pro-environmental values, in this case. 
Similarly, such individuals are likely to believe they have little control over an entrepreneurial situation or entrepreneurial outcomes (Markman, Balkin, & Baron, 2002). 
We reason that dissuasion from opportunities is likely to occur among entrepreneurs low in entrepreneurial self-efficacy, especially when decisions to pursue such opportunities do not align with their proenvironmental values. 
In consideration of this reasoning, and recognizing that the extent to which pro-environmental values are disengaged is reflected in the reduced impact of these values on the weight assigned to a specified harm to the natural environment in opportunity assessments, we offer the following hypothesis: 2013 1255Shepherd, Patzelt, and Baron Hypothesis 2. When assessing the attractiveness of various opportunities, the impact of pro-environmental values on the weight assigned to a specified harm to the natural environment is reduced to a greater degree when entrepreneurial self-efficacy is high than when it is low. 
Perceived industry munificence. 
Agency is exercised through self-efficacy and within “system conditions,” which concern “the changeability or controllability of the environment...[and represent] the opportunity structures to exercise personal efficacy and the ease of access to those opportunity structures” (Bandura, 1991: 269). 
For entrepreneurs, one substantial system condition is industry, specifically industry munificence—the “scarcity or abundance of critical resources needed by (one or more) firms operating within an environment” (Castrogiovanni, 1991: 542; cf. Dess & Beard, 1984). 
Some industries offer many resources and represent a decision context in which there is minimal difference in outcomes between poor and good judgments. 
That is, a high degree of industry munificence compensates for entrepreneurial and strategic weaknesses (Tsai et al., 1991). 
With greater environmental capacity, munificent environments are characterized as supporting growth and stability and enabling firms to build buffers against future hardship (Dess & Beard, 1984). 
These resourcerich (i.e., munificent) industries have been described as providing a tide that raises all boats (Wasserman, Anand, & Nohria, 2010). 
In contrast, less munificent environments (i.e., less environmental capacity) (Dess & Beard, 1984) are characterized by intense competition (Aldrich, 1979), lack of exploitable opportunities (Covin & Slevin, 1989), and hostility (Khandwalla, 1976/1977; Miller & Friesen, 1983). 
As a result, less abundant industries are more “selective,” in that decision makers’ judgments have a greater impact on performance outcomes than in more munificent environments (Covin & Slevin, 1989; Tushman, 1977; Zahra & Covin, 1995). 
Therefore, personal agency beliefs are likely to be higher in environments perceived as less munificent (than in those perceived as more munificent) because individuals believe their assessments and decisions will have a greater impact on the outcomes experienced (including forestalling undesirable performance outcomes). 
Perceived industry munificence may directly influence the extent to which pro-environmental values are disengaged. 
Firms have many ways to grow and profit for firms in munificent industries (Brittain & Freeman, 1980; Tushman & Anderson, 1986). 
Therefore, pursuing opportunities that harm the natural environment may be only one of the many ways to enhance firm performance. 
Indeed, opportunity exploitation itself may be viewed as involving an unnecessarily risky means of enhancing firm performance (Covin & Slevin, 1989). 
Therefore, there is little conflict between the cost of forgoing an opportunity and the values guiding the decision to forgo. 
Under such perceived conditions, proenvironmental values remain more fully engaged, and it is less likely that entrepreneurs will be drawn to opportunities that harm the natural environment. 
In contrast, less munificent industries are characterized in part by a “paucity of readily exploitable market opportunities” (Zahra & Covin, 1995: 48) and a lack of maneuverability. 
Under these conditions, there are fewer ways to enhance growth and profitability. 
Thus, opportunities that can potentially harm the natural environment are part of a much smaller set of opportunities that can potentially be developed. 
Indeed, empirical research has found that corporate entrepreneurship is more important for firm performance in resource-scarce industries than in more munificent industries (Covin & Slevin, 1989; Miller & Friesen, 1983; Zahra & Covin, 1995). 
Therefore, in an industry context perceived as less munificent, the importance of pursuing a focal opportunity conflicts with pro-environmental values to a greater extent. 
In turn, greater conflict between values and beliefs about influencing outcomes increases the likelihood that decision makers will disengage their values to a greater extent when assessing opportunities. 
For instance, such decision makers may tell themselves that after exploiting a particular opportunity and/or when the industry turns around, they will be in a better position to exploit only environmentally friendly opportunities in the future. 
In accordance with this reasoning, we offer the following hypothesis: Hypothesis 3. When assessing the attractiveness of various opportunities, the impact of pro-environmental values on the weight assigned to a specified harm to the natural environment is reduced to a greater degree when perceived industry munificence is low than when it is high. 
1256 OctoberAcademy of Management Journal DATA AND METHOD Research Design Given the sensitive nature of the topic of moral disengagement, empirical research is often difficult to conduct. 
Previous research has provided insight into the many cognitive strategies used to “justify” such behaviors, but unsurprisingly, it has been difficult to disentangle several possible explanations and establish direct causal links. 
Laboratory experiments have provided causal explanations for moral violations with simple tasks, yet (through necessity) such studies do not capture the richness of the context in which complex judgments and decisions concerning opportunity exploitation are made. 
To examine changes in decision makers’ assessments of opportunities based on specified harm to the natural environment from opportunity exploitation, we used a set of metric conjoint experiments, a within-person manipulations design, a postexperimental questionnaire, and secondary data. 
We chose conjoint analysis because it has been used in hundreds of judgment and decision-making studies throughout a variety of disciplines (Green, Krieger, & Wind, 2001), including marketing (see Carroll & Green, 1995), strategy (e.g., Pablo, 1994; Tyler & Steensma, 1995), entrepreneurship (for a review, see Lohrke, Holloway, and Woolley [2010]), and economic psychology (e.g., Poortinga, Steg, Vlek, & Wiersma, 2003). 
Specifically, conjoint analyses similar to the one we used here have been used to investigate complex decisions and evaluations, such as venture capitalists’ evaluations of potential portfolio companies’ probability of survival (Shepherd, 1999), alliance managers’ decisions about allocating further resources to underperforming alliances (Patzelt & Shepherd, 2008), entrepreneurs’ decisions to persist with poorly performing firms (DeTienne, Shepherd, & DeCastro, 2008), and entrepreneurs’ assessments of the likelihood that they would exploit specific opportunities (Choi & Shepherd, 2004; see also Mitchell, Shepherd, & Sharfman, 2011). 
Conjoint experiments require participants to assess a series of profiles and make a judgment about each profile. 
A profile is a combination of theoretically justified attributes of a decision task in which each attribute is represented by a level. 
Attributes are typically represented by one of two levels (high or low). 
An experimental design is used to determine which attribute level is used for a specific profile and how many profiles are needed to test the hypotheses (typically, more profiles are required for a greater number of attributes and for a greater number of two-way interactions between attributes to be tested). 
For metric conjoint analysis, the experimental design is typically orthogonal (i.e., there is zero correlation between attributes, so all combinations of levels across attributes are possible) and fractional (i.e., not all possible attributelevel combinations are presented to respondents). 
This technique generates real-time data (i.e., data are generated and collected as judgments are made). 
From the series of judgments made by an individual, analysis can decompose the “captured” judgments into their underlying structure (i.e., which attributes are significantly used in forming the judgments). 
Furthermore, analysis of a sample of participants must acknowledge and account for the nested nature of the data—namely, decisions nested in individuals. 
Random coefficient modeling (most commonly referred to as hierarchical linear modeling [HLM]) is well suited for dealing with nested data. 
The current study involves data at three levels: assessments nested in manipulated contexts nested in individuals. 
With HLM analysis (in this case, HLM 3), we captured the decision policy of the sample as a whole (from the decision at level 1), how that decision policy varies across manipulated contexts (level 2), and how the manipulated context’s impact on the decision policy is influenced by higher-level variables (level 3). In this case, the participants made judgments regarding the attractiveness of an opportunity for their current businesses according to attributes about the exploited opportunity’s potential to contribute to a firm’s competitive advantage. 
To provide a common context, participants were asked to make several assumptions before making their assessments, including “all opportunities presented can be pursued in the current economic situation in your country”; “the opportunities presented are independent of each other”; “your market position can be defended well against competition”; “the timeframe of exploiting the opportunity is projected to be two years”; “there are no substantial barriers to financing exploitation”; “exploitation can either take place within your existing firm or in a new firm”; and “other than the information provided in the hypothetical profiles, the opportunities presented operate in a similar industry as your current business and are otherwise similar to other opportunities you have seen in all respects.” We used an online research instrument to administer the experiments and survey. 
On average, it took the 2013 1257Shepherd, Patzelt, and Baron participants 28 minutes to complete both the experimental task (25 opportunity profiles; for details see below) and the postexperimental questionnaire. 
The profiles consisted of three attributes about the potential of the opportunity, if exploited, to contribute to a firm’s competitive advantage (discussed in greater detail in the next section, level 1 variables). 
Each attribute varied on two levels; consequently, there were eight (2 3 ) possible profile combinations. 
With replication and the use of three sets of conjoint experiments for each participant, the total number of profiles could have become unwieldy for participants. 
To make the assessment task more manageable, we used Hahn and Shapiro’s (1966) orthogonal fractional factorial design to reduce the number of different attribute level combinations to four. 
In choosing an orthogonal fractional factorial design, we followed the general rule of confounding the effects of greatest interest with effects that are unlikely to be significant or cause much bias in the estimated parameters (Green & Srinivasan, 1990). 
A practice profile was provided to familiarize the participants with the conjoint procedure. 
This design allowed us to control for all the main effects in calculating the overall attractiveness of opportunities before and after the manipulation. 
For the experimental manipulation (level 2 variable), respondents were asked to make a set of opportunity exploitation judgments in the context of a neutral impact on the natural environment (nine decisions: one practice, four original profiles, and four replicated profiles) and then in the context of a specified high negative impact on the natural environment (eight profiles: 4 original profiles and 4 replicated profiles). 
For the neutral context, participants were told that “the exploitation of the opportunity does not have any (negative or positive) impact on the natural environment in the local setting or other parts of the world.” For the negative context, participants were told that the “opportunity you are considering will cause a significant decline in the natural environment in the location where you live and in other parts of the world” (details of the information provided are stated below). 
To test for order effects, we created eight unique versions of the experiment that differed in order of attributes (two versions), order of profiles (two versions), and order of environmental impact information (two versions). 
Although this approach is common in terms of the order of attributes and order of profiles, the order of environmental impact information requires further comment. 
There is the possibility that by presenting the conjoint profiles for the neutral context first and then for the negative context, differences could be attributed to the order of the conjoint experiments rather than the manipulation. 
To reduce this possibility, we introduced a positive environmental impact condition (with 8 profiles: 4 original profiles and 4 replicated profiles) for which participants were told that “the exploitation of the opportunity can cause a significant improvement of the natural environment locally and in other parts of the world.” Half of the participants received neutral, positive, and then negative conditions, and the other half received neutral, negative, and then positive conditions. 
Participants were randomly assigned to one of the eight experimental forms. 
Because there were three “environmental impact” conditions, participants were asked to respond to a total of 25 profiles—9 profiles for the neutral condition (including the one practice profile, which was not used in the analysis), 8 profiles for the negative condition, and 8 profiles for the positive condition (which served to test for order effects). 
We used HLM to test for order effects for each of the order of attributes, the order of profiles, and the order of environmental information (each were entered as level 3 variables). 
The results indicated no significant order effects (p Ͼ .05). 
Sample The sampling frame included independent founders involved in new ventures located in business incubators in Germany. 
This population of founders is particularly appropriate for our purpose because incubators are specifically designed for individuals who have recently begun to exploit new business opportunities (Rice, 2002). 
From a list of incubators issued by the German Federal Association of Innovation, Technology and Start-Up Centers and other public sources, we identified 26 incubators in three states in spatial proximity to the second author’s location. 
From the incubators’ websites, we captured a list of all incubator ventures and their owner-managers. 
Subsidiaries of large firms were excluded from the list because their strategies could have been influenced by the strategic directions of their parent organizations. 
We also excluded firms that were no longer run by the initial business founder. 
Our final list contained 534 ventures run by 597 founders (some ventures were run by two or three individuals). 
1258 OctoberAcademy of Management Journal The founders were then contacted via phone over a four-month period. 
We explained the purpose of the study and asked if they would be willing to participate. 
Participation was voluntary, and those who participated received a small gift (a cup with the logo of the second author’s institution) after completing the task. 
We were able to contact 350 founders (all from different ventures). 
Further investigation revealed that 43 of the ventures with which we had failed to make contact had ceased operations. 
If a founder agreed to participate, we sent him or her an e-mail invitation summarizing the purpose of our study and providing a link to our online research instrument. 
Founders who agreed to participate but had not done so within two weeks of invitation were sent an e-mail reminding them of the importance of their participation and providing them with the link to the online instrument. 
We finally received responses from 93 founders, representing a 26.6 percent response rate in terms of individuals invited. 
Following recommendations for testing nonresponse bias (Dooley & Lindner, 2003), we used analysis of variable (ANOVA) to test for differences between early and late respondents on each of the hypothesized parameters—pro-environmental values, entrepreneurial self-efficacy, and perceived industry munificence. 
None of these tests revealed a significant difference (p Ͼ .10). 
The founders’ average age was 42.4 years (s.d. ϭ 11.1), and 83.1 percent of the sample consisted of men. 
Further, 75.3 percent held a master’s degree or higher, 41.6 percent had a background in engineering/technology; 30.3 percent, in business administration; 22.4 percent, in natural sciences and mathematics; and the rest had various other backgrounds (e.g., humanities). 
On average, participants had worked for 12.3 years in the private sector (s.d. ϭ 8.3) and had founded 1.75 businesses (s.d. ϭ 1.16). 
The average firm in our sample was 7.4 years old (s.d. ϭ 5.9) and had 9.5 employees (s.d. ϭ 32.1). 
In all, 75.3 percent of the firms were technologybased ventures (e.g., biotechnology, information technology, optical devices), and the others belonged to various low-technology industries (e.g., marketing and trade). 
Variables and Measures Level 1: Opportunity assessment. 
A founder’s assessment policy was decomposed into a coefficient for each of the assessment attributes and an intercept. 
The intercept indicates the participant’s assessment of the attractiveness to exploit an opportunity over and above the influence of the opportunity’s strategic attributes—value, rarity, and nonimitability/nonsubstitutability. 
Following Haynie, Shepherd, and McMullen (2009), we characterized each strategic attribute of the opportunity as either high or low: (1) When value is high, an opportunity exhibits the potential for considerable increases in efficiency and effectiveness; when value is low,itexhibits the potential for minimal increases in efficiency and effectiveness. 
(2) When rarity is high, information about an opportunity is not widely available to others; when rarity is low, information about the opportunity is widely available to others. 
(3) When inimitability/nonsubstitutability is high, others have minimal possibilities to imitate (or develop substitutes for) an opportunity; when inimitability/nonsubstitutability is low, others have considerable possibilities to imitate (or develop substitutes for) the opportunity. 
Participants read the following instruction: “Indicate (using the scale provided) your assessment of the opportunity in terms of the opportunity’s potential, if exploited, to confer upon your firm a sustainable competitive advantage in the marketplace.” For each of the scenarios in each context, this assessment outcome was measured on a Likert scale (1 ϭ “not at all attractive,” 11 ϭ “very attractive”). 
We want to emphasize that the participants chose how likely they were to pursue the entrepreneurial opportunity, not to assess a specific mode of exploitation. 
In constructing the conjoint profile, we used full profiles and a rating scale (for a full description, see Green and Srinivasan [1990] and Louviere [1988]) that is consistent with Shepherd (1999), but we used three, rather than eight, attributes per profile. 
Level 2: Specified harm to natural environment. 
The following was presented to the entrepreneurs to indicate specified harm to the natural environment: Please assume that yesterday a scientific journal published a study showing that pursuing the opportunity you are considering will cause a significant decline in the natural environment in the location where you live and in other parts of the world. 
Specifically, the published study reported the following: ● Chemical experiments showed that one of the waste products of the production process underlying the opportunity can act as a greenhouse gas.In 2013 1259Shepherd, Patzelt, and Baron the laboratory, the greenhouse gas effect was 250 times stronger than for carbon dioxide, which is a known greenhouse gas. 
● Calculations of the scientists showed that the amount of emissions of the production site on which you base your business model can have a measurable impact on the greenhouse effect. 
According to the predictions, temperatures are likely to rise by 5% per year in areas where the waste product is emitted. 
● The published figures also suggest that from the predicted production and sales volumes in the business plan over the next five years, the cumulated emissions can measurably contribute to global warming. 
The impact is likely to be about 10% of the impact of globally emitted carbon dioxide (which is responsible for about 60% of human-made climate change). 
Level 3: Pro-environmental values. 
The sustainable development values scale (Shepherd et al., 2009) includes a subscale for “respect for nature” (four items). 
On a seven-point Likert-type scale, participants were asked to choose between two alternative statements: “Sometimes, some natural resources need to be sacrificed for important developments” and “All precautions must be taken to protect natural resources in our development efforts”; “Current patterns of production only require minor adjustments to protect the welfare of the natural environment” and “Current patterns of production must be substantially changed to protect the welfare of the natural environment”; “People only need to make minor changes to their current consumption out of respect for nature” and “People must make major changes to their current consumption out of respect for nature”; and “To a certain extent, the natural environment will look after itself to the benefit of future generations” and “It is the obligation of a society to vigorously protect the natural environment for the benefit of future generations.” The internal reliability of the scale used to test the hypotheses had a Cronbach’s alpha of .79. 
We chose the respect for nature subscale (Shepherd et al., 2009) for several reasons. 
First, it was derived from the fundamental values the United Nations identified as crucial for sustainable development in its Millennium Declaration. 
Therefore, the scale provides the opportunity to capture a construct whose definition is widely known and accepted. 
Second, the scale items are not dependent on any specific context or sample properties and are thus applicable for our purpose without needing to be modified. 
Finally, the scale was developed by a rigorous process, including validation on two independent samples, and it shows solid psychometric properties. 
Level 3: Entrepreneurial self-efficacy. 
The entrepreneurial self-efficacy scale (Chen et al., 1998) includes 22 items. 
This scale describes tasks and roles that are typical in the entrepreneurial context. 
Respondents rated their belief in their ability to accomplish a task (1 ϭ “completely unsure,” 5 ϭ “completely sure”). 
Examples of these items include “Set and meet market share goals”; “Introduce new products and services”; and “Define organizational roles, responsibilities, and policies.” Our calculation of the scale’s internal reliability for the analyses that followed yielded a Cronbach’s alpha of .93. 
Level 3: Perceived industry munificence. 
Respondents were asked to assess the environmental munificence their firms face, using a three-item scale reported by Covin and Slevin (1989) and based on Khandwalla (1976/1977), and which has been used in many strategy studies (e.g., AtuaheneGima & Ko, 2001; Covin & Slevin, 1989; Lumpkin & Dess, 2001; Naman & Slevin, 1993). 
We reversecoded the scores because the original scale had lower scores representing greater perceived munificence. 
A confirmatory factor analysis of the responses used to test the hypotheses revealed one factor with a Cronbach’s alpha of .60, which is consistent with Naman and Slevin’s (1993) and Atuahene-Gima and Ko’s (2001) values (.63 and .65, respectively). 
In keeping with the notion that executives’ judgments and information processing depend on perceptions rather than objective characteristics of the environment (Boyd, Dess, & Rasheed, 1993; Boyd & Fulk, 1996; Garg, Walters, & Priem, 2003), we propose that it is the belief of personal agency (in this case, perceived industry munificence) that influences the extent of pro-environmental values disengagement. 
To be conservative, however, we tested the robustness of the above operationalization using an objective measure of munificence, one consistent with those used in prior studies (Mishina et al., 2010; Mishina, Pollock, & Porac, 2004) and based on work by Dess and Beard (1984). 
First, we calculated the slope coefficient for the regression of time on the value of shipments for a firm’s industry for the five years preceding our study. 
Second, we calculated the mean value of shipments for the firm’s industry in the five-year time frame. 
Finally, 1260 OctoberAcademy of Management Journal we calculated objective industry munificence by dividing the regression slope by the mean value to adjust for absolute industry size (Dess & Beard, 1984). 
We used three-digit industry codes defined by the German Statistics Agency (four-digit codes were not available for the time frame under consideration). 
Control variables. 
In keeping with previous studies in decision making, we used control variables related to individuals and the industry in which their firm operates (Gimeno, Folta, Cooper, & Woo, 1997). 
First, asking them to indicate their year of birth, we captured participants’ age in years, because entrepreneurs’ decision policies may change with age (Bird, 1989). 
Second, we controlled for the dynamism of firm environment, because industry dynamism has been found to influence managers’ (Goll & Rasheed, 1997; Hough & White, 2003) and entrepreneurs’ decisions (Miller, 1983; Wiklund & Shepherd, 2003). 
Industry dynamism was measured using a four-item scale developed by Miller and Friesen (1982) and refined by Miller (1987) (␣ϭ .75). 
In a robustness test of our model, we used an objective measure of dynamism (along with an objective measure of munificence) operationalized as the standard error of the regression slope divided by the mean value of shipments, using the same regression models and data sources described earlier for environmental munificence (cf. Mishina et al., 2004, 2010). 
The above control variables were at level 3. Finally, as indicated earlier, we controlled for the broad strategic attributes of the opportunity (level 1). ANALYSIS AND RESULTS Of the 93 entrepreneurs that started the experiment, four did not complete it and were dropped from the study. 
The conjoint profiles were fully replicated, allowing for a test of correlation between each individual’s answers for the original profiles and his or her answers for the replicated profiles. 
A test–retest correlation for each respondent indicated that six respondents had very low reliability (below .30). 
As have others conducting conjoint and policy-capturing studies (Hitt & Middlemist, 1979; Keats, 1991; Patzelt & Shepherd, 2008, 2009; Tyler & Steensma, 1995), we dropped these six nonreliable responses from the study. 
The final sample of 83 founders had a mean test–retest correlation of .87. 1 The design of this conjoint experiment resulted in 16 assessment observations per individual (i.e., 8 for an environmentally neutral condition and 8 for an environmentally harmful condition), or 1,328 total observations across the neutral and harm conditions. 
Because the data were nested, we relied on HLM for data analysis. 
HLM is particularly effective with nested data because it controls for the autocorrelation and heteroskedasticity that may be inherent in such data (Raudenbush & Bryk, 2002). 
In Table 1, we report the means, standard deviations, and correlations of the variables at the individual level. 
As shown, the correlations are generally low, and there is only one significant correlation. 
To be conservative and ensure that multicollinearity among the independent variables is not a potential problem in our study, we meancentered the independent variables and calculated the variance inflation factors (VIF) and conditions statistics. 
All VIFs were below 2.0, and the conditions statistics were below 14.0, well below the generally accepted limit of 10.0 (Kutner, Nachtsheim, & Neter, 2004) and 30 (Belsley, Kuh, & Welsch, 1980), respectively. 
Table 2 summarizes the results of the HLM analysis. 
Row 1 represents the intercept for the overall model. 
In rows 2–4, we report the main effects of the level 1 variables on the participants’ assessments of the attractiveness of exploiting opportunities. 
In rows 5–12, we report on the weight assigned to the specified harm to the natural environment, which is captured by an intercept (row 5); the level 3 control variables of age and dynamism (rows 6 and 7, respectively); the level 3 main effects of pro-environmental values (row 8), entrepreneurial self-efficacy (row 9), and perceived munificence (row 10); and the level 3 interactions of entrepreneurial self-efficacy with pro-environmental values (row 11) and of perceived munificence with pro-environmental values (row 12). 
First, we report the base model with the level 1, level 2, and level 3 controls only; then we add the level 3 main effects; and finally, we add level 3 two-way interactions (i.e., the full model). 
In addition to testing the hypotheses (see below), two findings reported in Table 2 support the validity of our results and experimental approach. 
In all models 1 The results reported below remain substantially the same when the unreliable respondents are kept in the sample. 
2013 1261Shepherd, Patzelt, and Baron reported, the coefficients for value (2.62, p Ͻ .001), rarity (0.53, p Ͻ .001), and inimitability (1.68, p Ͻ .001) are positive and significant. 
These coefficients represent the average effect of the opportunity’s attributes on participants’ assessments of opportunity attractiveness when the manipulation of harm to the natural environment is controlled for. 
Thus, these findings support previous results by Haynie et al. (2009). 
Second, in all models, the coefficient for the intercept for the specified harm to the natural environment is negative and significant (Ϫ2.68, p Ͻ .001), which supports the assumption that, on average, the information about the specified harm to the natural environment has a negative impact on entrepreneurs’ assessments of the attractiveness of opportunity exploitation (controlling for the value, rarity, and inimitability of the opportunity and level 3 variables). 
The purpose of our model, however, is to explain variance in the weight assigned to a specified harm to the natural environment in assessments of opportunity attractiveness. 
First, we hypothesized that in assessing the attractiveness of opportunities, the stronger the entrepreneurs’ pro-environmental values, the greater the weight they assign to (i.e., the greater the emphasis they place on) the specified harm to the natural environment these opportunities will generate when exploited. 
To test this hypothesis, we turn to the main effects model in Table 2. In this model, the coefficient of pro-environmental values is negative but not significant (Ϫ0.10, p Ͼ .10). 
Therefore, this finding does not provide support for Hypothesis 1. However, care must be taken in interpreting findings of main effects in the presence of significant interactions. 
The final step was to add the interaction terms at level 3 to test Hypotheses 2 and 3. We hypothesized that entrepreneurial self-efficacy is positively related to the extent to which pro-environmental values are disengaged. 
Thus, in assessing the attracTABLE 1 Means, Standard Deviations, and Correlations Variables Mean s.d. 1 2 3 4 1. Age 43.43 11.08 2. Perceived dynamism 19.52 3.80 .11 3. Pro-environmental values 5.43 0.97 .07 .02 4. Entrepreneurial self-efficacy 17.67 2.54 Ϫ.11 .04 Ϫ.07 5. Perceived munificence 9.80 2.63 Ϫ.07 .20 Ϫ.11 .44** ** p Ͻ .01 TABLE 2 Results of HLM on the Effect of Agency on Weight of Harm to the Natural Environment in Assessments of Opportunity Attractiveness a Variables Base Model Main Effects Model Full Model 1. Intercept for overall model 4.14*** (.11) 4.14*** (.11) 4.14*** (.11) 2. Value 2.62*** (.17) 2.17*** (.17) 2.17*** (.17) 3. Rare 0.53*** (.13) 0.53*** (.13) 0.53*** (.13) 4. Inimitable 1.68*** (.12) 1.68*** (.12) 1.68*** (.12) 5. Intercept for information about harm to the natural environment Ϫ2.68*** (.17) Ϫ2.68*** (.16) Ϫ2.68*** (.16) 6. Age Ϫ0.04** (.01) Ϫ0.04** (.01) Ϫ0.04** (.01) 7. Perceived dynamism 0.09 † (.05)0.09* (.04) 0.09* (.04) 8. Pro-environmental values Ϫ0.10 (.20) Ϫ0.11 (.19) 9. Entrepreneurial self-efficacy 0.05 (.06) 0.09 (.06) 10. Perceived munificence Ϫ0.10 (.08) Ϫ0.11 (.07) 11. Pro-environmental values ϫ entrepreneurial self-efficacy 0.19* (.08) 12. Pro-environmental values ϫ munificence Ϫ0.18* (.09) a Over and above strategic attributes of the opportunity. 
† p Ͻ .10 * p Ͻ .05 ** p Ͻ .01 *** p Ͻ .001 1262 OctoberAcademy of Management Journal tiveness of various opportunities, the reduced impact of pro-environmental values on the weight assigned to a specified harm to the natural environment is greater when entrepreneurial self-efficacy is high than when it is low (Hypothesis 2). In Table 2, the coefficient of the interaction between proenvironmental values and entrepreneurial self-efficacy is positive and significant (0.19, p Ͻ .05). 
We also hypothesized that perceived industry munificence is negatively related to the extent to which pro-environmental values are disengaged. 
Thus, when entrepreneurs assess the attractiveness of various opportunities, the reduced negative impact of pro-environmental values on the weight assigned to a specified harm to the natural environment is greater when perceived industry munificence is low than when it is high (Hypothesis 3). In Table 2, the coefficient of the interaction between pro-environmental values and perceived industry munificence is negative and significant (Ϫ0.18, p Ͻ .05). 
To illustrate the nature of these interactions and interpret them in the context of our hypotheses, we turn to Figure 1. Figure 1A indicates that the weight assigned to specified harm to the natural environment on opportunity assessment increases (i.e., becomes more negative) with pro-environmental values for those with low entrepreneurial self-efficacy but decreases (i.e., becomes less negative/approaches a zero weight) for those with high entrepreneurial self-efficacy. 
Indeed, among entrepreneurs with high pro-environmental values, those with low entrepreneurial self-efficacy place a weight of Ϫ3.87 on the specified harm to the natural environment in assessing opportunity attractiveness, whereas entrepreneurs with high entrepreneurial self-efficacy assign a weight of Ϫ1.95 to the specified harm. 
That is, despite sharing high pro-environmental values, those with high entrepreneurial self-efficacy weight harm to the natural environment about half as negatively as those with low entrepreneurial self-efficacy. 
Recognizing that the extent of proenvironmental values disengagement is manifested as a reduced impact of pro-environmental values on the weight assigned to a specified harm to the natural environment in opportunity assessments, the graph indicates that pro-environmental values disengagement is greater when entrepreneurial self-efficacy is high than when it is low. 
This finding provides support for Hypothesis 2. Figure 1B indicates that the weight assigned to a specified harm to the natural environment on opportunity assessment decreases (i.e., becomes less negative/approaches a zero weight) with pro-environmental values for those who perceive industry munificence to be low, but increases (i.e., becomes more negative) for those who perceive industry munificence to be high. 
For example, among entrepreneurs with high pro-environmental values, operating in an industry perceived to be highly munificent results in a weight of Ϫ3.89 assigned to the specified harm to the natural environment in assessing opporFIGURE 1A Entrepreneurial Self-Efficacy Moderates the Effect of the Relationship between Pro-environmental Values and the Weight Assigned to Environmental Harm on the Assessment of Opportunity Attractiveness 1 7 Low Entrepreneurial Self-Efficacy High Entrepreneurial Self-Efficacy 2 3 4 5 6 –4 –3 –2 –1 Pro-environmental Values Weight Assigned to Harm to the Natural Environment in the Assessment of Opportunity 0 1 Zero Weight 2013 1263Shepherd, Patzelt, and Baron tunity attractiveness. 
In contrast, entrepreneurs operating in an industry perceived to be low in munificence assign a weight of Ϫ1.87 to the specified harm. 
That is, in industries perceived to be low in munificence, entrepreneurs with high environmental values assign a weight to the specified harm that is only about half as negative as that assigned by entrepreneurs in industries perceived to be highly munificent (notwithstanding their similar pro-environmental values). 
Again, acknowledging that the extent of pro-environmental values disengagement is manifested as a reduced negative impact of pro-environmental values on the weight assigned to a specified harm to the natural environment in opportunity assessments, the plot indicates that pro-environmental values disengagement is greater when industry munificence is perceived as low than when it is perceived as high. 
This finding provides support for Hypothesis 3. Interestingly, these findings of support for Hypotheses 2 and 3 suggest that the stronger the pro-environmental values, the more the entrepreneurs with high personal agency disengaged their pro-environmental values. 
We speculate on this interesting finding in the discussion. 
Robustness of Results Objective measure of munificence. 
As have other researchers (Boyd et al., 1993; Boyd & Fulk, 1996; Garg et al., 2003), we deliberately tested our model using a perceptual measure of munificence, because we theorized that when it comes to the extent of pro-environmental values disengagement, it is individuals’ agency beliefs that are important, regardless of whether these beliefs align with the objective nature of their industry. 
Nevertheless, it is useful to test the robustness of the model with objective measures of an industry, as this enables an explanation of disengagement without needing to directly access decision makers’ beliefs. 
As explained in the research methods section above, we followed others (Dess & Beard, 1984; Mishina et al., 2004, 2010) to create a more objective measure of industry munificence (and the control variable for dynamism). 
We found that the coefficient of the interaction term for pro-environmental values and objective industry munificence was significant (Ϫ14.93, p Ͻ .05), and that the nature of this relationship was consistent with that reported for the main results above. 
Thus, the role of munificence in explaining the extent of pro-environmental values disengagement is robust to objective measures of the industry. 
The interaction term for pro-environmental values and entrepreneurial self-efficacy was not significant and is, therefore, not robust to the objective measure of industry. 
We discuss this nonfinding below. 
Nonhypothetical decision. 
In this study, we used a conjoint experiment to capture entrepreneurs’ actual assessments of hypothetical opportunity exploitation decisions within different manipulated FIGURE 1B Perceived Industry Munificence Moderates the Effect of the Relationship between Pro-environmental Values and the Weight Assigned to Environmental Harm on the Assessment of Opportunity Attractiveness Weight Assigned to Harm to the Natural Environment in the Assessment of Opportunity High Perceived Industry Munificence Low Perceived Industry Munificence 1 7 2 3 4 5 6 Pro-environmental Values Zero Weight –4 –3 –2 –1 0 1 1264 OctoberAcademy of Management Journal contexts of impact to the natural environment. 
This experimental design helped us control for many potentially confounding variables. 
Here, we use a nonhypothetical decision to test the robustness of our results. 
That is, rather than explain the relationship between pro-environmental values and the “weight assigned to harm to the natural environment in the assessment of opportunity attractiveness,” we explain the relationship between pro-environmental values and “entry into an energyinefficient industry.” Although these dependent variables are not identical, they are similar, in that they both capture the assessed attractiveness of opportunity exploitation associated with harm to the natural environment. 
Specifically, the decision of which industry to enter is an important one—whether it is enacted by creating a new firm (Bates, 1995; Parker & van Praag, 2012) or by joining an existing firm already embedded in an industry (Chatterjee & Singh, 1999; Porter, 1980). 
Moreover, the higher an industry’s energy inefficiency, the higher its energy intensity and the greater the harm it causes to the natural environment (Wackernagel et al., 1999). 
An industry’s energy intensity refers to the amount of energy needed for a €1 value creation (BMU, 2011) and is measured and reported for ten different industry sectors (representing approximately a one-digit industry classification code) in the environmental economics report issued by the German Ministry for Environment, Environmental Protection, and Nuclear Safety in collaboration with the German Environmental Agency (BMU, 2011). 
It is possible, however, that an entrepreneur enters a more environmentally harmful industry to introduce an environmentally friendly technology or process to help preserve the natural environment. 
Therefore, we captured this possibility through a variable indicating whether a venture’s business model was explicitly dedicated to environmental protection (e.g., environmental engineering, solar technology). 
This variable was dummy-coded 1 if a venture had an environmental focus and 0 if not and used as an additional control variable. 
As with the results reported for the experimental approach, we found that the coefficient of the interaction term for pro-environmental values and objective industry munificence was significant and negative (Ϫ1.34, p Ͻ .05). 
The nature of this relationship indicates that those in low-munificence environments disengage their pro-environmental values more to enter energy-inefficient industries than those in high-munificence environments. 
Thus, this robustness test provides general support for our findings, in support of Hypothesis 3, and does so with respect to an actual, rather than hypothetical, decision. 
We did not, however, find significant evidence in support of the positive relationship between entrepreneurial self-efficacy and pro-environmental values disengagement (Hypothesis 2). An explanation for this nonfinding is offered below. 
DISCUSSION In the current article, we developed a theoretical framework for understanding the role of agency in values disengagement and tested this model in the context of harm to the natural environment. 
This approach aligns with Bandura’s suggestion that individuals (and society) have a “moral obligation to preserve the environment” (2007: 9). Although we found that pro-environmental values did not have a significant main effect on the weight entrepreneurs attached to a specified harm to the natural environment in their assessments of opportunity attractiveness, we observed significant contingent relationships with both entrepreneurial self-efficacy and perceived industry munificence. 
Specifically, in entrepreneurs’ assessments of the attractiveness of opportunities, the extent to which they demonstrated disengagement of pro-environmental values was greater when (1) entrepreneurial self-efficacy was high than when it was low, and (2) industry munificence was perceived as low than when it was perceived as high. 
These findings are consistent with our reasoning and have several implications. 
Turning first to moral disengagement theory, this perspective suggests that disengagement often occurs through cognitive restructuring of harm-producing decisions or actions, so they appear to be more in keeping with personal values. 
Cognitive restructuring can involve several different techniques, including euphemistic labeling (McAlister, Bandura, & Owen, 2006; Tenbrunsel & Messick, 2004) and advantageous social comparison (Bandura, 2002), both of which distort perceptions of value-inconsistent decisions, so they appear less harmful and even, perhaps, benign or beneficial (Bandura, 1986). 
We offer insights into a somewhat different mechanism of moral disengagement. 
Specifically, complementing and extending previous research on how decision makers cognitively restructure the harm they generate (or the responsibility for it) to disengage their values (Bandura, 1986, 2002), we found that decision makers adjust 2013 1265Shepherd, Patzelt, and Baron the relationship between values and the weight assigned to a specified harm as a means for disengaging their values. 
Under conditions of high personal agency (high entrepreneurial self-efficacy, perceived low environmental munificence), there was greater values disengagement—that is, a weak relationship between pro-environmental values and the weight assigned to the specified harm. 
This finding extends our understanding of the conditions under which more moral disengagement is likely to occur. 
Second, although previous research has already investigated the role of self-efficacy (Murdock et al., 2001), resource-scarce environments (Staw & Szwajkowski, 1975), and firm performance (Mishina et al., 2010) on immoral, dishonest, and illegal decisions and behaviors, we offer new insights into these relationships. 
Indeed, we did not find a significant main effect for any of these potential predictors on the weight assigned to specified harm in individuals’ assessments of the attractiveness of acting on an opportunity. 
Rather, we found that such effects occurred only when these predictors were investigated in combination with values. 
That is, as we theorize, entrepreneurial self-efficacy and perceived resource scarcity contribute to a condition of personal agency that can influence moral disengagement, which in turn enhances the perceived attractiveness—and acceptability—of opportunities causing environmental harm. 
Third, previous studies have found a negative relationship between self-efficacy and unethical behavior (Finn & Frone, 2004; Murdock et al., 2001). 
These studies have typically investigated unethical behavior on required tasks that individuals low in self-efficacy find threatening (e.g., a test [Farnese et al., 2011; Locke et al., 1984]). 
We found a positive relationship between self-efficacy and moral disengagement in the context investigated here. 
We theorized that low entrepreneurial selfefficacy individuals would be less conflicted between the benefits of opportunity exploitation and their moral values than high entrepreneurial selfefficacy individuals would be; thus, there would be less need for them to morally disengage. 
This finding helps to clarify the relationships between selfefficacy and moral disengagement. 
Fourth, we offer a different approach to measuring moral disengagement. 
Rather than asking individuals to report on their use of the cognitive tactics of moral disengagement (e.g., Bandura et al., 1996; Caprara et al., 2009; Detert et al., 2008), we captured the relationship between values and moral disengagement through the weight assigned to a specified harm in the assessment of opportunities. 
Specifically, the greater the decrease in the impact of values on the weight assigned to such harm, the greater the degree of moral disengagement. 
This new approach captures the process of moral disengagement as it happens and provides researchers the opportunity to manipulate decision contexts to explore what triggers moral disengagement. 
Finally, an important stream of current entrepreneurship research has investigated the impact of entrepreneurial action on the natural environment (see Hall, Daneke, & Lenox, 2010). 
Specifically, this line of research has focused on why opportunities for environmental preservation exist and are developed (Cohen & Winn, 2007; Dean & McMullen, 2007; York & Venkataraman, 2010), and why some individuals are more motivated to recognize and exploit these opportunities than others (Choi & Gray, 2008; Patzelt & Shepherd, 2011). 
The reverse side of entrepreneurial action’s environmental impact (namely, decisions to exploit opportunities that harm the natural environment) has received little attention. 
Our study investigates this issue and suggests that moral values—specifically, proenvironmental values—play a key role in explaining why entrepreneurs choose to act or not act upon environmentally harmful opportunities. 
Perhaps the most important implication of our results for research on environmental and sustainable entrepreneurship, however, is the finding that the extent to which entrepreneurs disengage these pro-environmental values depends strongly on personal agency, as reflected both in beliefs about the task (i.e., entrepreneurial self-efficacy) and beliefs about the industry environment (i.e., perceived level of munificence). 
From a practical perspective, our study provides entrepreneurs with an improved understanding of the consequences of their own opportunity-assessment policies. 
Knowing that high entrepreneurial self-efficacy and the perception of low industry munificence diminish the impact of pro-environmental values on entrepreneurs’ assessments of the attractiveness of environmentally harmful opportunities can help increase their attention to the environmental—and perhaps long-term—consequences of the business opportunities they choose to pursue. 
Second, for policy makers’ efforts to protect and sustain the natural environment, it appears that legal frameworks for environmental protection may be particularly important for industries characterized by low munificence in which a scarcity of oppor1266 OctoberAcademy of Management Journal tunities and resources tends to “encourage” greater disengagement of pro-environmental values. 
Finally, the results of this study suggest a potential and surprising downside to efforts to enhance students’ entrepreneurial self-efficacy (Zhao et al., 2005). 
Such efforts, it appears, may actually have the unexpected effect of encouraging students to disengage their pro-environmental values in assessing the attractiveness of environmentally harmful opportunities. 
Future research should explore this intriguing issue further. 
At this point, we should acknowledge a somewhat unexpected finding shown in Figures 1A and 1B. For individuals high in entrepreneurial selfefficacy and individuals working in low-munificence industries, the stronger their pro-environmental values, the less weight they assigned to harm to the natural environment in assessing various opportunities. 
In other words, although our expectation was that disengagement would be less for entrepreneurs with strong pro-environmental values, we found that the stronger their pro-environmental values, the more such entrepreneurs disengaged their pro-environmental values. 
One possible explanation for this pattern may lie in the fact that in both instances, individuals believe they can and do “make a difference”—namely, that their decisions and actions shape important outcomes. 
In one case (i.e., high entrepreneurial self-efficacy), this stemmed from the belief that they could accomplish whatever they set out to accomplish, while in the other (i.e., low perceived munificence), it reflected the fact that a perceived scarcity of resources magnifies the importance of individual decisions and actions. 
In turn, these beliefs in personal agency may increase the desire to downplay or discount values that might possibly interfere with attaining personal success. 
That is, individuals with strong pro-environmental values might want to get every possible obstacle (i.e., their values) out of the way and thus disengage to a greater extent. 
Additional research is clearly needed to assess this possibility. 
Finally, although the moderating role of munificence was robust to both a change from a subjective to an objective measure of munificence and a change in the dependent variable, the moderating role of entrepreneurial self-efficacy was not. 
The lack of robustness of the change in the dependent variable may be due—at least in part—to the coarse-grained proxy of the decision to act that causes harm to the natural environment. 
In changing from each entrepreneur’s subjective assessment of the munificence of his or her environment to an objective measure of munificence assigned to each firm in the same industry, the data become more nested, and this reduced independence may have adversely impacted statistical power. 
Therefore, our ability to detect the moderating role of entrepreneurial self-efficacy on the relationship between pro-environmental values and the weight assigned to harm to the natural environment may have been sufficiently reduced. 
Future research that manipulates or theoretically samples environmental munificence will be able to further investigate the robustness of, as well as extend, the current study. 
Limitations and Future Research We used conjoint analysis in this research because it reduces the social desirability and retrospective reporting biases associated with self-reports of judgments (Lohrke et al., 2010; Shepherd & Zacharakis, 1997). 
However, conjoint analysis specifically, and experiments more generally, also have important limitations. 
First, experiments in general represent an artificial setting, and critics argue that results obtained under such conditions may not necessarily reflect individuals’ “real” judgments. 
About conjoint experiments, critics might note that profiles are an abstract approximation of the “real” world and that this approximation is imperfect and removes emotion and other contextual aspects from judgments. 
We fully acknowledge this limitation; however, we wish to call attention to the following advantages of experimental approaches: (1) judgments are made in a relatively controlled environment, (2) they are observed in real time and are thus not subject to hindsight bias and other retrospective reporting biases, and (3) it is possible to establish causal relationships between the stimulus provided (i.e., the profile) and judgment outcomes. 
We should also note that past research has shown that “hypothetical” profiles used in judgment tasks produce decisions highly similar to “actual” decisions (Brown, 1972; Hammond & Adelman, 1976; Riquelme & Rickards, 1992). 
Certainly, however, an analysis of entrepreneurs’ judgments of environmentally harmful opportunities under nonexperimental conditions would be valuable. 
Indeed, in the post hoc test described above, we offered initial evidence that—at least for the relationship between perceived industry munificence and the extent of values disengagement—entrepreneurs make decisions 2013 1267Shepherd, Patzelt, and Baron and act in ways inconsistent with their pro-environmental values. 
Second, we acknowledge the difficulties in measuring pro-environmental values. 
While we used an established scale (Shepherd et al., 2009), it is sometimes difficult to distinguish a measure of values from a measure of political or economic views, which can generally be violated or more easily changed than values. 
We believe that the scale items we used are reflective of values because they are stated in a way that represents beliefs about a desired end state (e.g., protecting natural resources [Schwartz, 1994]). 
However, there is still likely to be some overlap with political-economic views. 
Future research, therefore, should attempt to distinguish between individuals’ values and economic and political views in exploring the extent of disengagement—perhaps by using validated scales for assessing economic (Furnham, 1984; Tang, 1992) and political (Carpini & Keeter, 1993) views. 
Third, we investigated the conditions of values disengagement at the individual level of analysis. 
Future research should explore the conditions under which moral disengagement occurs with respect to team decision making. 
For example, what roles do heterogeneity in values, entrepreneurial self-efficacy, and perceptions of resource abundance play in teams’ assessments of opportunities—especially opportunities that can cause environmental harm? 
Further, the individuals in our sample were all entrepreneurs of businesses located in incubators. 
It is possible that factors related to the disengagement of pro-environmental values for such entrepreneurs are different in some way from those related to values disengagement for other entrepreneurs (Phan, Siegel, & Wright, 2005). 
This possibility should be carefully investigated. 
Finally, our research was conducted in only one country (Germany). 
Thus, the question of crossnational generalization remains open. 
Although our theorizing was general in scope and not linked to any particular culture, it is possible that participants in this research differ with respect to environmental issues from populations in other countries (Franzen, 2003). 
Future research, therefore, should be conducted in additional cultures to fully assess generalization. 
Conclusion In conclusion, we sought to increase the current understanding of moral disengagement by investigating the role of personal agency in the extent to which values are disengaged in assessing the attractiveness of business opportunities. 
Specifically, we theorized and found that entrepreneurs’ degree of disengagement was greater when personal agency was high (i.e., high entrepreneurial self-efficacy, low perceived industry munificence) than when it was low (i.e., low entrepreneurial self-efficacy, high perceived industry munificence). 
Our model and findings add to the current knowledge concerning the “when” of moral disengagement— namely, under what conditions this process is more activated. 
It remains for future research, however, to shed additional light not only on when individuals disengage their own moral values more but why they choose to do so. Although the processes involved are certainly complex, efforts to understand them more fully are essential because, as Albert Einstein noted when commenting on the devastating impact of human activity on the natural environment, “we shall require a substantially new manner of thinking if humankind is to survive.” REFERENCES Agle, B. R., Mitchell, R. K., & Sonnenfeld, J. A. 1999. 
Who matters to CEOs? 
An investigation of stakeholder attributes and salience, corporate performance, and CEO values. 
Academy of Management Journal, 42: 507–525. 
Aldrich, H. E. 1979. 
Organizations and environments. 
Englewood Cliffs, NJ: Prentice Hall. 
ARD. 
2012. 
Der dm-Check [The dm-check] http://www. 
ardmediathek.de/das-erste/reportage-dokumentation/ der-dm-check?documentIdϭ10528720. 
Accessed July 18. Atuahene-Gima, K., & Ko, A. 2001. 
An empirical investigation of the effect of market orientation and entrepreneurship orientation alignment on product innovation. 
Organization Science, 12: 54–74. 
Bandura, A. 1986. 
Social foundations of thought and action: A social cognitive theory. 
Englewood Cliffs, NJ: Prentice-Hall. 
Bandura, A. 1989. 
Regulation of cognitive processes through perceived self-efficacy. 
Developmental Psychology, 25: 729–735. 
Bandura, A. 1991. 
Social cognitive theory of self-regulation. 
Organizational Behavior and Human Decision Processes, 50: 248–287. 
Bandura, A. 1999. 
Social cognitive theory: An agentic perspective. 
Asian Journal of Social Psychology, 2: 21–41. 
Bandura, A. 2001. 
Social cognitive theory: An agentic 1268 OctoberAcademy of Management Journal perspective. 
In S. T. Fiske, D. L. Schacter, & C. ZahnWaxler (Eds.), Annual review of psychology, vol. 
52: 1–26. 
Palo Alto, CA. Annual Reviews. 
Bandura, A. 2002. 
Social cognitive theory in cultural context. 
Applied Psychology: An International Review, 51: 269–290. 
Bandura, A. 2006. 
Toward a psychology of human agency. 
Perspectives on Psychological Science, 1(2): 164 –180. 
Bandura, A. 2007. 
Impeding ecological sustainability through selective moral disengagement. 
International Journal of Innovation and Sustainable Development, 2: 8–35. 
Bandura, A., Barbaranelli, C., Caprara, G. V., & Pastorelli, C. 1996. 
Mechanisms of moral disengagement in the exercise of moral agency. 
Journal of Personality and Social Psychology, 71: 364–374. 
Bandura, A., & Schunk, D. H. 1981. 
Cultivating competence, self-efficacy, and intrinsic interest through proximal self-motivation. 
Journal of Personality and Social Psychology, 41: 586–598. 
Bandura, A., Underwood, B., & From, M. E. 1975. 
Disinhibition of aggression through diffusion of responsibility and dehumanization of victims. 
Journal of Research in Personality, 9: 253–269. 
Bansal, P., & Roth, K. 2000. 
Why companies go green: A model of ecological responsiveness. 
Academy of Management Journal, 43: 717–736. 
Bates, T. 1995. 
Self-employment entry across industry groups. 
Journal of Business Venturing, 10: 143–157. 
Belsley, D. A., Kuh, E., & Welsch, R. E. 1980. 
Regression diagnostics: Identifying influential observations and sources of collinearity; Hoboken, NJ: Wiley. 
Bird, B. 1989. 
Entrepreneurial behavior. 
Glenview, IL: Scott, Foresman. 
BMU. 
2011. 
Umweltwirtschaftsbericht 2011 [Environmental economics report 2011]. 
Berlin: Bundesamt für Umwelt, Naturschutz und Reaktorsicherheit. 
Boyd, B. K., Dess, G. G., & Rasheed, A. M. A. 1993. 
Divergence between archival and perceptual measures of the environment: Causes and consequences. 
Academy of Management Review, 18: 204–226. 
Boyd, B. K., & Fulk, J. 1996. 
Executive scanning and perceived uncertainty: A multidimensional model. 
Journal of Management, 22: 1–21. 
Boyd, N. G., & Vozikis, G. S. 1994. 
The influence of self-efficacy on the development of entrepreneurial intentions and actions. 
Entrepreneurship: Theory and Practice, 18: 63–77. 
Brittain, J. W., & Freeman, J. H. 1980. 
Organizational proliferation and density dependent selection. 
In J. Kimberly & R. H. Miles (Eds.), The organizational life cycle: 291–338. 
San Francisco: Jossey-Bass. 
Brown, E. H. P. 1972. 
A comparison of judgmental policy equations obtained from human judges under natural and contrived conditions. 
Mathematical Biosciences, 15: 205–230. 
Bucar, B., & Hisrich, R. D. 2001. 
Ethics of business managers vs. entrepreneurs. 
Journal of Developmental Entrepreneurship, 6(1): 59–78. 
Caprara, G. V., Fida, R., Vecchione, M., Tramontano, C., & Barbaranelli, C. 2009. 
Assessing civic moral disengagement: Dimensionality and construct validity. 
Personality and Individual Differences, 47: 504– 509. 
Carpini, M. X. D., & Keeter, S. 1993. 
Measuring political knowledge: Putting first things first. American Journal of Political Science, 37: 1179–1206. 
Carroll, J. D., & Green, P. E. 1995. 
Guest editorial: Psychometric methods in marketing research: part I, Conjoint analysis. 
Journal of Marketing Research, 32: 385–391. 
Castrogiovanni, G. J. 1991. 
Environmental munificence: A theoretical assessment. 
Academy of Management Review, 16: 542–565. 
Chatterjee, S., & Singh, J. 1999. 
Are tradeoffs inherent in diversification moves? 
A simultaneous model for type of diversification and mode of expansion decisions. 
Management Science, 45: 25–41. 
Chen, C. C., Greene, P. G., & Crick, A. 1998. 
Does entrepreneurial self-efficacy distinguish entrepreneurs from managers? 
Journal of Business Venturing, 13: 295–316. 
Choi, Y. D., & Gray, E. R. 2008. 
Socially responsible entrepreneurs: What do they do to create and build their companies? 
Business Horizons, 51: 341–352. 
Choi, Y. R., & Shepherd, D. A. 2004. 
Entrepreneurs’ decisions to exploit opportunities. 
Journal of Management, 30: 377–395. 
Cohen, B., & Winn, M. I. 2007. 
Market imperfections, opportunity and sustainable entrepreneurship. 
Journal of Business Venturing, 22: 29–49. 
Covin, J. G., & Slevin, D. 1989. 
Strategic management of small firms in hostile and benign environments. 
Strategic Management Journal, 10: 75–87. 
Csikszentmihalyi, M. 1979. 
Intrinsic rewards and emergent motivation. 
In M. R. Lepper & D. Greene (Eds.), The hidden costs of reward: 205–216. 
Morristown, NJ: Erlbaum. 
Daily, G. C. 1997. 
Valuing and safeguarding Earth’s lifesupport systems. 
In G. D. Daily (Ed.), Nature’s services: Societal dependence on natural ecosystems: 365–374. 
Washington: Island Press. 
2013 1269Shepherd, Patzelt, and Baron Davidsson, P., & Honig, B. 2003. 
The role of social and human capital among nascent entrepreneurs. 
Journal of Business Venturing, 18: 301–331. 
Dean, T. J., & McMullen, J. S. 2007. 
Toward a theory of sustainable entrepreneurship: Reducing environmental degradation through entrepreneurial action. 
Journal of Business Venturing, 22: 50–76. 
Dess, G. G., & Beard, D. W. 1984. 
Dimensions of organizational task environments. 
Administrative Science Quarterly, 29: 52–73. 
Detert, J. R., Treviño, L. K., & Sweitzer, V. L. 2008. 
Moral disengagement in ethical decision making: A study of antecedents and outcomes. 
Journal of Applied Psychology, 93: 374–391. 
DeTienne, D. R., Shepherd, D. A., & DeCastro, J. O. 2008. 
The fallacy of “only the strong survive”: The effects of extrinsic motivation on the persistence decisions for under-performing firms. 
Journal of Business Venturing, 23: 528–546. 
Dooley, L. M., & Lindner, R. 2003. 
The handling of nonresponse error. 
Human Resource Development Quarterly, 14: 99–110. 
Douglas, T. 1995. 
Scapegoats: Transferring blame. 
New York: Routledge. 
Farnese, M. L., Tramontano, C., Fida, R., & Paciello, M. 2011. 
Cheating behaviors in academic context: Does academic moral disengagement matter? 
Procedia— Social and Behavioral Sciences, 29: 356–365. 
Finn, K. V., & Frone, M. R. 2004. 
Academic performance and cheating: Moderating role of school identification and self-efficacy. 
Journal of Educational Research, 97: 115–122. 
Fishbein, M., & Ajzen, I. 1972. 
Attitudes and opinions. 
In P. H. Mussen & M. R. Rosenzweig (Eds.), Annual review of psychology, vol. 
23: 487–544. 
Palo Alto, CA: Annual Reviews. 
Franzen, A. 2003. 
Environmental attitudes in international comparison: An analysis of the ISSP surveys 1993 and 2000. 
Social Science Quarterly, 84: 297– 308. 
Furnham, A. 1984. 
Many sides of the coin: The psychology of money usage. 
Personality and Individual Differences, 5: 501–509. 
Garg, V. K., Walters, B. A., & Priem, R. L. 2003. 
Chief executive scanning emphases, environmental dynamism, and manufacturing firm performance. 
Strategic Management Journal, 24: 725–744. 
Gartner, W. B. 1990. 
What are we talking about when we talk about entrepreneurship? 
Journal of Business Venturing, 5: 15–28. 
Gimeno, J., Folta, T. B., Cooper, A. C., & Woo, C. Y. 1997. 
Survival of the fittest? 
Entrepreneurial human capital and the persistence of underperforming firms. 
Administrative Science Quarterly, 42: 750–783. 
Gist, M. E. 1987. 
Self-efficacy: Implications for organizational behavior and human resource management. 
Academy of Management Review, 12: 472–485. 
Goll, I., & Rasheed, A. M. A. 1997. 
Rational decision making and firm performance: The moderating role of environment. 
Strategic Management Journal, 18: 583–591. 
Green, P. E., Krieger, A. M., & Wind, Y. 2001. 
Thirty years of conjoint analysis: Reflections and prospects. 
Interfaces, 31(3): S56–S73. 
Green, P. E., & Srinivasan, V. 1990. 
Conjoint analysis in marketing: New developments with implications for research and practice. 
Journal of Marketing, 54: 3–19. 
Grusec, J. E. 2011. 
Domains of social knowledge and socialization theory. 
Human Development, 54: 343– 347. 
Hahn, G. J., & Shapiro, S. S. 1966. 
A catalog and computer program for the design and analysis of orthogonal symmetric and asymmetric fractional factorial experiments. 
Schenectady, NY: General Electric Research and Development Center. 
Hall, J. K., Daneke, G. A., & Lenox, M. J. 2010. 
Sustainable development and entrepreneurship: Past contributions and future directions. 
Journal of Business Venturing, 25: 439–448. 
Hammond, K. R., & Adelman, L. 1976. 
Science, values, and human judgment. 
Science, 194: 389–396. 
Hannafey, F. T. 2003. 
Entrepreneurship and ethics: A literature review. 
Journal of Business Ethics, 46: 99–110. 
Haynie, J. M., Shepherd, D., & McMullen, J. 2009. 
An opportunity for me? 
The role of resources in opportunity evaluation decisions. 
Journal of Management Studies, 46: 337–361. 
Hitt, M. A., & Middlemist, R. D. 1979. 
A methodology to develop the criteria and criteria weightings for assessing subunit effectiveness in organizations. 
Academy of Management Journal, 22: 356–374. 
Hmieleski, K. M., & Baron, R. A. 2009. 
Entrepreneurs’ optimism and new venture performance: A social cognitive perspective. 
Academy of Management Journal, 52: 473–488. 
Hough, J. R., & White, M. A. 2003. 
Environmental dynamism and strategic decision-making rationality: An examination at the decision level. 
Strategic Management Journal, 24: 481–489. 
Judge, T. A., & Bretz, R. D. 1992. 
Effects of work values on job choice decisions. 
Journal of Applied Psychology, 77: 261–271. 
1270 OctoberAcademy of Management Journal Karpoff, J. M., Lee, D. S., & Martin, G. S. 2008. 
The consequences to managers for financial misrepresentation. 
Journal of Financial Economics, 88: 193– 215. 
Karpoff, J. M., & Lott, J. R. 1993. 
The reputational penalty firms bear from committing criminal fraud. 
Journal of Law and Economics, 36: 757–802. 
Keats, B. W. 1991. 
An empirical investigation of strategic investment decision models. 
Strategic Management Journal, 12: 243–250. 
Khandwalla, P. N. 1976/1977. 
Some top management styles, their context and performance. 
Organization and Administrative Sciences, 7(4): 21–51. 
Kuratko, D. F., Hornsby, J. S., & Naffziger, D. W. 1997. 
An examination of owner’s goals in sustaining entrepreneurship. 
Journal of Small Business Management, 35: 24 –33. 
Kutner, M. H., Nachtsheim, C. J., & Neter, J. 2004. 
Applied linear regression methods (4th ed.). 
Chicago: McGraw-Hill/Irwin. 
Lawrence, A., and Morrell, D. 1995. 
Leading-edge environmental management. 
In J. Post (Ed.), Research in corporate social performance and policy: 99–126. 
Greenwich, CT: JAI. 
Levenson, H. 1981. 
Differentiating among internality, powerful others, and chance. 
In H. M. Lefcourt (Ed.), Research with the locus of control: vol. 
1, Assessment methods: 15–63. 
New York: Academic. 
Locke, E. A., Frederick, E., Lee, C., & Bobko, P. 1984. 
Effect of self-efficacy, goals, and task strategies on task performance. 
Journal of Applied Psychology, 69: 241–251. 
Lohrke, F. T., Holloway, B. B., & Woolley, T. W. 2010. 
Conjoint analysis in entrepreneurship research: A review and research agenda. 
Organizational Research Methods, 13: 16–30. 
Louviere, J. J. 1988. 
Conjoint-analysis modeling of stated preferences: A review of theory, methods, recent developments and external validity. 
Journal of Transport Economics and Policy, 22: 93–119. 
Lumpkin, G. T., & Dess, G. G. 2001. 
Linking two dimensions of entrepreneurial orientation to firm performance: The moderating role of environment and industry life cycle. 
Journal of Business Venturing, 16: 429–451. 
Markman, G. D., Balkin, D. B., & Baron, R. A. 2002. 
Inventors and new venture formation: The effects of general self-efficacy and regretful thinking. 
Entrepreneurship: Theory and Practice, 27: 149–165. 
McAlister, A. L., Bandura, A., & Owen, S. V. 2006. 
Mechanisms of moral disengagement in support of military force: The impact of Sept. 
11. Journal of Social and Clinical Psychology, 25: 141–165. 
Miller, D. 1983. 
The correlates of entrepreneurship in three types of firms. 
Management Science, 29: 770– 791. 
Miller, D. 1987. 
The genesis of configuration. 
Academy of Management Review, 12: 686–701. 
Miller, D., & Friesen, P. H. 1982. 
Innovation in conservation and entrepreneurial firms: Two models of strategic momentum. 
Strategic Management Journal, 3: 1–25. 
Miller, D., & Friesen, P. H. 1983. 
Strategy-making and environment: The third link. 
Strategic Management Journal, 4: 221–235. 
Mishina, Y., Dykes, B. J., Block, E. S., & Pollock, T. G. 2010. 
Why “good” firms do bad things: The effects of high aspirations, high expectations, and prominence on the incidence of corporate illegality. 
Academy of Management Journal, 53: 701–722. 
Mishina, Y., Pollock, T. G., & Porac, J. F. 2004. 
Are more resources always better for growth? 
Resource stickiness in market and product expansion. 
Strategic Management Journal, 25: 1179–1197. 
Mitchell, J. R., Shepherd, D. A., & Sharfman, M. 2011. 
Erratic strategic decisions: When and why managers are inconsistent in strategic decision making. 
Strategic Management Journal, 32: 683–704. 
Moore, C. 2008. 
Moral disengagement in processes of organizational corruption. 
Journal of Business Ethics, 80: 129–139. 
Moore, C., Detert, J. R., Treviño, L. K., Baker, V. L., & Mayer, D. M. 2012. 
Why employees do bad things: Moral disengagement and unethical organizational behavior. 
Personnel Psychology, 65: 1–48. 
Muehlebach, A. 2001. 
“Making place” at the United Nations: Indigenous cultural politics at the U.N. working group on indigenous populations. 
Cultural Anthropology, 16: 415–448. 
Murdock, T. B., Hale, N. M., & Weber, M. J. 2001. 
Predictors of cheating among early adolescents: Academic and social motivations. 
Contemporary Educational Psychology, 26: 96–115. 
Naman, J. L., & Slevin, D. P. 1993. 
Entrepreneurship and the concept of fit: A model and empirical tests. 
Strategic Management Journal, 14: 137–153. 
Pablo, A. L. 1994. 
Determinants of acquisition integration level: A decision-making perspective. 
Academy of Management Journal, 37: 803–836. 
Parker, S. C., & van Praag, C. M. 2012. 
The entrepreneur’s mode of entry: Business takeover or new venture start? 
Journal of Business Venturing, 27: 31– 46. Parris, T. M., & Kates, R. W. 2003. 
Characterizing and measuring sustainable development. 
In P. Matson, W. Clark, A. Gadgil, P. Gleick, D. Kammen, D. Ken2013 1271Shepherd, Patzelt, and Baron nedy et al. (Eds.), Annual review of environment and resources, vol. 
28: 559–586. 
Palo Alto, CA. Annual Reviews. 
Patzelt, H., & Shepherd, D. A. 2008. 
The decision to persist with underperforming alliances: The role of trust and control. 
Journal of Management Studies, 45: 1217–1243. 
Patzelt, H., & Shepherd, D. A. 2009. 
Strategic entrepreneurship at universities: Academic entrepreneurs’ assessment of policy programs. 
Entrepreneurship: Theory and Practice, 33: 319–340. 
Patzelt, H., & Shepherd, D. A. 2011. 
Recognizing opportunities for sustainable development. 
Entrepreneurship: Theory and Practice, 35: 631–652. 
Phan, P. H., Siegel, D. S., & Wright, M. 2005. 
Science parks and incubators: Observations, synthesis and future research. 
Journal of Business Venturing, 20: 165–182. 
Poortinga, W., Steg, L., Vlek, C., & Wiersma, G. 2003. 
Household preferences for energy-saving measures: A conjoint analysis. 
Journal of Economic Psychology, 24: 49–64. 
Porter, M. E. 1980. 
Competitive strategy. 
New York: Free Press. 
Raudenbush, S. W., & Bryk, A. S. 2002. 
Hierarchical linear modeling: Applications and data analysis methods. 
Thousand Oaks, CA: Sage. 
Rice, M. P. 2002. 
Co-production of business assistance in business incubators: An exploratory study. 
Journal of Business Venturing, 17: 163–187. 
Riquelme, H., & Rickards, T. 1992. 
Hybrid conjoint analysis: An estimation probe in new venture decisions. 
Journal of Business Venturing, 7: 505–518. 
Rokeach, M. 1973. 
The nature of human values. 
New York: Free Press. 
Ryan, R. M., & Deci, E. L. 2000. 
Self-determination theory and the facilitation of intrinsic motivation, social development, and well-being. 
American Psychologist, 55: 68–78. 
Ryan, R. M., & Deci, E. L. 2001. 
To be happy or to be self-fulfilled: A review of research on hedonic and eudaimonic well-being. 
In S. T. Fiske, D. L. Schacter, & C. Zahn-Waxler (Eds.), Annual review of psychology, vol. 
52: 141–166. 
Palo Alto, CA. Annual Reviews. 
Schwartz, S. H. 1994. 
Are there universal aspects in the structure and contents of human values. 
Journal of Social Issues, 50(4): 19–45. 
Schwartz, S. H., & Bilsky, W. 1990. 
Toward a theory of the universal content and structure of values: Extensions and cross-cultural replications. 
Journal of Personality and Social Psychology, 58: 878–891. 
Shepherd, D. A. 1999. 
Venture capitalists’ assessment of new venture survival. Management Science, 45: 621–632. 
Shepherd, D. A., Kuskova, V., & Patzelt, H. 2009. 
Measuring the values that underlie sustainable development: The development of a valid scale. 
Journal of Economic Psychology, 30: 246–256. 
Shepherd, D. A., & Zacharakis, A. L. 1997. 
Conjoint analysis: A window of opportunity for entrepreneurship research. 
In J. A. Katz & R. H. Brockhaus (Eds.), Advances in entrepreneurship, firm emergence and growth, vol. 
3: 203–248. 
Greenwich, CT: JAI. 
Shu, L. L., Gino, F., & Bazerman, M. H. 2011. 
Dishonest deed, clear conscience: When cheating leads to moral disengagement and motivated forgetting. 
Personality and Social Psychology Bulletin, 37: 330– 349. 
Spash, C. L. 2002. 
Greenhouse economics: Values and ethics. 
London: Routledge. 
Srivastava, A., Locke, E. A., Judge, T. A., & Adams, J. W. 2010. 
Core self-evaluations as causes of satisfaction: The mediating role of seeking task complexity. 
Journal of Vocational Behavior, 77: 255–265. 
Stajkovic, A. D., & Luthans, F. 1998. 
Self-efficacy and work-related performance: A meta-analysis. 
Psychological Bulletin, 124: 240–261. 
Staw, B. M., & Szwajkowski, E. 1975. 
The scarcity-munificence component of organizational environments and the commission of illegal acts. 
Administrative Science Quarterly, 20: 345–354. 
Tang, T. L. P. 1992. 
The meaning of money revisited. 
Journal of Organizational Behavior, 13: 197–202. 
Tenbrunsel, A., & Messick, D. 2004. 
Ethical fading: The role of self-deception in unethical behavior. 
Social Justice Research, 17: 223–236. 
Thøgersen, J., & Ölander, F. 2002. 
Human values and the emergence of a sustainable consumption pattern: A panel study. 
Journal of Economic Psychology, 23: 605–630. 
Tsai, W. M. H., MacMillan, I. C., & Low, M. B. 1991. 
Effects of strategy and environment on corporate venture success in industrial markets. 
Journal of Business Venturing, 6: 9–28. 
Tushman, M. L. 1977. 
Special boundary roles in the innovation process. 
Administrative Science Quarterly, 22: 587–605. 
Tushman, M. L., & Anderson, P. 1986. 
Technological discontinuities and organizational environments. 
Administrative Science Quarterly, 31: 439–465. 
Tyler, B. B., & Steensma, H. K. 1995. 
Evaluating technological collaborative opportunities: A cognitive mod1272 OctoberAcademy of Management Journal eling perspective. 
Strategic Management Journal, 16: 43–70. 
United Nations General Assembly. 
2000. 
United Nations millennium declaration. 
UN Doc A/RES/55/2: 1–9. 
New York: United Nations. 
Utsch, A., Rauch, A. J., Rothfuss, R., & Frese, M. 1999. 
Who becomes a small-scale entrepreneur in a postsocialist environment? 
On the differences between entrepreneurs and managers in East Germany. 
Journal of Small Business Management, 37(3): 31– 42. Wackernagel, M., Onisto, L., Bello, P., Linares, A. C., Falfan, I. S. L., Garcia, J. M., Guerrero, A. I. S., & Guerrero, M. G. S. 1999. 
National natural capital accounting with the ecological footprint concept. 
Ecological Economics, 29: 375–390. 
Wasserman, N., Anand, B., & Nohria, N. 2010. 
When does leadership matter? 
A contingent opportunities view of CEO leadership. 
In N. Nohria & R. Khurana (Eds.), Handbook of leadership theory and practice: A Harvard Business School centennial colloquium: 27–64. 
Boston: Harvard Business School Publishing. 
White, J., Bandura, A., & Bero, L. A. 2009. 
Moral disengagement in the corporate world. 
Accountability in Research: Policies and Quality Assurance, 16: 41– 74. Wiesenfeld, B., Wurthmann, K., & Hambrick, D. 2008. 
The stigmatization and devaluation of elites associated with corporate failures: A process model. 
Academy of Management Review, 33: 231–251. 
Wiklund, J., & Shepherd, D. 2003. 
Aspiring for, and achieving growth: The moderating role of resources and opportunities. 
Journal of Management Studies, 40: 1919 –1941. 
York, J. G., & Venkataraman, S. 2010. 
The entrepreneur– environment nexus: Uncertainty, innovation, and allocation. 
Journal of Business Venturing, 25: 449– 463. 
Zahra, S. A., & Covin, J. G. 1995. 
Contextual influences on the corporate entrepreneurship-performance relationship: A longitudinal analysis. 
Journal of Business Venturing, 10: 43–58. 
Zhao, H., Seibert, S. E., & Hills, G. E. 2005. 
The mediating role of self-efficacy in the development of entrepreneurial intentions. 
Journal of Applied Psychology, 90: 1265–1272. 
Zhao, H., Seibert, S. E., & Lumpkin, G. T. 2010. 
The relationship of personality to entrepreneurial intentions and performance: A meta-analytic review. 
Journal of Management, 36: 381–404. 
Dean A. Shepherd (shepherd@indiana.edu) is the Randall L. Tobias Chair in Entrepreneurial Leadership and a professor of entrepreneurship at the Kelley School of Business, Indiana University. 
He earned his Ph.D. at Bond University. 
His research focuses on entrepreneurial decision making, opportunity, and failure. 
Holger Patzelt (patzelt@tum.de) is the Chair in Entrepreneurship and professor of entrepreneurship at the Technische Universität München. 
He earned his Ph.D. in entrepreneurship at the Universität of Bamberg and a Ph.D. in biosciences at the Universität of Heidelberg. 
His research focuses on entrepreneurial cognition and strategy in high-technology ventures. 
Robert A. Baron (Robert.baron@okstate.edu) is the Spears Chair of Entrepreneurship and professor of entrepreneurship in the Spears School of Business (School of Entrepreneurship), Oklahoma State University. 
He received his Ph.D. from the University of Iowa. 
His research focuses on cognitive and social factors in entrepreneurship. 
2013 1273Shepherd, Patzelt, and Baron Copyright of Academy of Management Journal is the property of Academy of Management and its content may not be copied or emailed to multiple sites or posted to a listserv without the copyright holder's express written permission. 
However, users may print, download, or email articles for individual use. 